Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.490

Compliance with chapter—Violation—Penalties. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

Any person who fails to comply with this chapter may be subject to:

(1) Denial, revocation, or suspension of the person's nursery dealer license or Christmas tree grower license; and/or

(2) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Every person who, through an act of commission or omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty provided in this section.

[ 2007 c 335 s 18; 2000 c 144 s 31; 1990 c 261 s 14; 1985 c 36 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 27.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.490

Compliance with chapter—Violation—Penalties. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

Any person who fails to comply with this chapter may be subject to:

(1) Denial, revocation, or suspension of the person's nursery dealer license; and/or

(2) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Every person who, through an act of commission or omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty provided in this section.

[ 2000 c 144 s 31; 1990 c 261 s 14; 1985 c 36 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 27.]